Missouri, session 2026, HB2072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 565.056, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 565.056, to read as follows:
565.056. 1. A person commits the offense of assault in the fourth degree if:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes physical injury, physical pain,
or illness to another person;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes physical injury to another person by
means of a firearm;
(3) The person purposely places another person in apprehension of immediate
physical injury;
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of death
or serious physical injury to another person;
(5) The person knowingly causes or attempts to cause physical contact with a person
with a disability, which a reasonable person, who does not have a disability, would consider
offensive or provocative; [or]
(6) The person knowingly causes physical contact with another person knowing the
other person will regard the contact as offensive or provocative; or
(7) The person knowingly causes physical pain to a special victim as that term is
defined in section 565.002.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2072 2
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, assault in the fourth degree is a
class A misdemeanor.
3. Violation of the provisions of subdivision (3) or (6) of subsection 1 of this section
is a class C misdemeanor unless the victim is a special victim, as the term "special victim" is
defined under section 565.002, in which case a violation of such provisions is a class A
misdemeanor. Violation of the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of this section
is a class A misdemeanor unless the person has previously been found guilty or pled
guilty to an assault offense as defined under section 565.079 or an assault in violation of
a county or municipal ordinance, in which case the offense is a class E felony. A person
who has previously been found guilty or pled guilty to an assault offense on two or more
occasions and who violates the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of this
section shall be guilty of a class D felony.
4. A person found guilty of a violation of subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of this
section shall not be sentenced to a fine and shall not be eligible for probation or parole
until the person has served a minimum of six months of incarceration for a first offense
or one year of incarceration for a second or subsequent offense.
✔